Illinois, session 104th, HB5169.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $22,000,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the Department of Human Services for grants to 7municipalities or counties under the Senior Home Preservation 8Program. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102026.